Maryland, session 2025, HB0566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
19–102.
This title applies only in Dorchester County.
19–601.
(a) There is a Class A beer license.
– 1 –

Ch. 832 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The annual license fee is [$200] $250.
19–603.
(a) There is a Class C beer license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$250] $150.
19–802.
(a) There is a Class A beer and wine license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$250] $350.
19–803.
(a) There is a Class B beer and wine license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$300] $350.
19–804.
(a) There is a Class C beer and wine license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$150] $250.
19–805.
(a) There is a Class D beer and wine license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$275] $350.
19–902.
(a) There is a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$1,000] $1,250.
19–1201.
(a) There is a Class B caterer’s license.
(f) The annual license fee is [$150] $200.
19–1309.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 832
(a) There is a Class C per diem beer and a Class C per diem beer and wine license.
(c) The fee for a Class C per diem beer license or Class C per diem beer and wine
license is [$15] $25 per day.
19–1310.
(a) There is a Class C per diem beer, wine, and liquor license.
(c) The fee for the license is [$25] $35 per day.
19–1408.
(A) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER FEE REQUIRED FOR A LICENSE, THE
BOARD MAY CHARGE AN APPLICATION FEE FOR A NEW LICENSE IN THE AMOUNT OF:
(I) $150 FOR AN APPLICATION FOR A CLASS A, CLASS B, CLASS
C, OR CLASS D BEER AND WINE LICENSE; AND
(II) $200 FOR AN APPLICATION FOR A CLASS A, CLASS B, CLASS
C, OR CLASS D BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(2) THE APPLICATION FEE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS
NONREFUNDABLE WHETHER THE LICENSE IS ISSUED OR DENIED.
(3) THE APPLICATION FEE DOES NOT APPLY TO THE RENEWAL OR
TRANSFER OF A LICENSE FOR THE SAME PREMISES.
(B) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER FEE REQUIRED FOR A LICENSE, THE BOARD
MAY CHARGE A TRANSFER FEE OF $50 PER LICENSE TRANSFER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –